Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Judges, Districts, and Terms of Court

§ 9-7-1.
Judges; election; holding of terms of court; term of office; residence.

A circuit judge shall be elected for and from each circuit court district and the listing of individual precincts shall be those precincts as they existed on October 1, 1990. He may hold court in any other district with the consent of the judge thereof, when in their opinion the public interest may require. The terms of all circuit judges hereafter elected shall begin on the first day of January 1931 and their terms of office shall continue for four (4) years. A circuit judge shall be a resident of the district in which he or she serves but shall not be required to be a resident of a subdistrict if the district is divided into subdistricts.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 6 (3, 12); 1857, ch. 61, arts. 7, 8; 1871, §§ 526, 531; 1880, § 1483; 1892, § 631; 1906, § 689; Hemingway’s 1917, § 467; 1930, § 476; 1942, § 1414; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 37; Laws, 2002, ch. 356, § 2. (See Editor’s note).

§ 9-7-3.
Circuit court districts and terms of court; number of judges; powers and duties of judges.

The state is divided into an appropriate number of circuit court districts severally numbered and composed of the counties as set forth in the sections which follow. A court to be styled “The Circuit Court of the County of_______________ ” shall be held in each county, and within each judicial district of a county having two (2) judicial districts, at least twice a year. Court shall be held in circuit court districts consisting of a single county on the same dates state agencies and political subdivisions are open for business excluding legal holidays. The dates upon which terms shall commence and the number of days for which the terms shall continue in circuit court districts consisting of more than one (1) county shall be set by order of the circuit court judge in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. A matter in court may extend past a term if the interest of justice so requires.

An order establishing the commencement and continuation of terms of court for each of the counties within a circuit court district consisting of more than one (1) county shall be entered annually and not later than October 1 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the terms of court are to become effective. Notice of the dates upon which the terms of court shall commence and the number of days for which the terms shall continue in each of the counties within a circuit court district shall be posted in the office of the circuit clerk of each county within the district and mailed to the office of the Secretary of State for publication and distribution to all Mississippi Bar members. If an order is not timely entered, the terms of court for each of the counties within any circuit court district shall remain unchanged for the next calendar year.A certified copy of any order entered under the provisions of this subsection shall, immediately upon the entry thereof, be delivered to the clerk of the board of supervisors in each of the counties within the circuit court district.

The number of judges in each circuit court district shall be determined by the Legislature based upon the following criteria:

The population of the district;

The number of cases filed in the district;

The case load of each judge in the district;

The geographic area of the district;

An analysis of the needs of the district by the court personnel of the district; and

Any other appropriate criteria.

The Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center and the Administrative Office of Courts shall determine the appropriate:

Specific data to be collected as a basis for applying the above criteria;

Method of collecting and maintaining the specified data; and

Method of assimilating the specified data.

In a district having more than one (1) office of circuit judge, there shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of those offices except that the judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of that court or, should no judge have served longer in office than the others, the judge who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar, shall be the senior judge. The senior judge shall have the right to assign causes and dockets and to set terms in districts consisting of more than one (1) county. A circuit court judge shall have the right to assign criminal matters to county court as provided in Section 9-9-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1394; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1934, ch. 180; Laws, 1936, ch. 227; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex. ch. 13; Laws, 1954, ch. 254, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 443, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 22; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 38; Laws, 2013, ch. 361, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-5.
First district; composition.

The First Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Alcorn County;

Itawamba County;

Lee County;

Monroe County;

Pontotoc County;

Prentiss County; and

Tishomingo County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1395; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1934, ch. 180; Laws, 1936, ch. 227; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex. ch. 13; Laws, 1946, ch. 350; Laws, 1950, ch. 329; Laws, 1958, ch. 247; Laws, 1960, ch. 230; Laws, 1968, ch. 325, § 5; Laws, 1972, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 39; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-7.
First district; number of judges.

There shall be four (4) judges for the First Circuit Court District.

The four (4) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two,” “Place Three” and “Place Four.” The judge to fill Place One must reside in Alcorn, Prentiss or Tishomingo County. The judges to fill Place Two and Place Three must reside in Itawamba, Lee, Monroe or Pontotoc County. The judge to fill Place Four may be a resident of any county in the district. Election of the four (4) offices of judge shall be by election to be held in every county within the First Circuit Court District.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1395.1; Laws, 1968, ch. 325, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1974, ch. 373, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 40; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 9; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-9.
Second district; composition.

The Second Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Hancock County;

Harrison County; and

Stone County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1396; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1932, ch. 144; Laws, 1934, ch 181; Laws, 1938, ch. 274; Laws, 1940, ch. 228; Laws, 1948, ch. 249; Laws, 1954, chs. 225, 242; Laws, 1958, ch. 265; Laws, 1962, ch. 288; Laws, 1968, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 352; Laws, 1976, ch. 313; Laws, 1979, ch. 332; Laws, 1983, ch. 367, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 24; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 41; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-11.
Second district; number and election of judges.

There shall be four (4) judges for the Second Circuit Court District.

The four (4) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two,” “Place Three” and “Place Four.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1396.1; Laws, 1968, ch. 326, §§ 2-4; Laws, 1971, ch. 328, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 42; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-13.
Third district; composition.

The Third Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Benton County;

Calhoun County;

Chickasaw County;

Lafayette County;

Marshall County;

Tippah County; and

Union County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1397; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1944, ch. 311; Laws, 1964, ch. 310; Laws, 1964, ch. 311; Laws, 1971, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch 432, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 25; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 43; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-14.
Third district; number of judges.

There shall be three (3) judges for the Third Circuit Court District.

The three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two” and “Place Three.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 44; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 10; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 37, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015); Laws, 2019, ch. 456, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2019).

§ 9-7-15.
Fourth district; composition; divisions; local contributions for support of court.

The Fourth Circuit Court District shall be composed of the following counties:

Leflore County;

Sunflower County; and

Washington County.

The Fourth Circuit Court District shall be divided into four (4) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 4-1 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties:

Leflore County: Minter City, North Greenwood, Money, Northeast Greenwood, Schlater, West Greenwood, Mississippi Valley State University and Southeast Greenwood Precincts; and

Sunflower County: Ruleville, Rome, Sunflower Plantation, Drew, Doddsville, Boyer-Linn, Fairview-Hale and Ruleville North Precincts.

Subdistrict 4-2 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties:

Sunflower County: Indianola 1, Sunflower, Indianola 3 North, Indianola 3 South and Indianola 3 Northeast Precincts; and

Washington County: Extension Building, Faith Lutheran Church, American Legion, Metcalfe City Hall, Elks Club, Leland Health Department Clinic, Leland Light and Water Plant and Greenville Industrial College Precincts.

Subdistrict 4-3 shall consist of the following precincts in the following counties:

Leflore County: East Greenwood Sub-A, East Greenwood Sub-B, Central Greenwood, North Itta Bena, South Itta Bena, Southwest Greenwood, Rising Sun, Sidon, Morgan City, Swiftown and South Greenwood Precincts;

Sunflower County: Moorhead, Inverness, Indianola 2 West and Indianola 2 East Precincts; and

Washington County: Arcola City Hall, Hollandale City Hall, Darlove Baptist Church and Mangelardi Bourbon Store Precincts.

Subdistrict 4-4 shall consist of the following precincts in Washington County: St. James Episcopal Church, Swiftwater Baptist Church, Glen Allan Health Clinic, Italian Club, Ward’s Recreation Center, Buster Brown Community Center, Avon Health Center, Kapco Company, Brent Center, William Percy Library and Grace Methodist Church Precincts.

The local contributions required for the maintenance of the Fourth Circuit Court District shall be paid on a pro rata basis each by Leflore, Sunflower and Washington Counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1398; Laws, 1931, Ex. ch. 37; Laws, 1932, ch. 214; Laws, 1934, ch. 182; Laws, 1942, ch. 314; Laws, 1944, ch. 312; Laws, 1959, Ex. ch. 25; Laws, 1964, ch. 312; Laws, 1968, ch. 327, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 26; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 45, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-7-17.
Fourth district; number and election of judges.

There shall be four (4) circuit judges for the Fourth Circuit Court District. One (1) circuit judge shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1398.1; Laws, 1968, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 48; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 46, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-7-18.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 101, eff from and after January 1, 1995.

§9-7-18. [Laws, 1989, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989].

§ 9-7-19.
Fifth district; composition.

The Fifth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Attala County;

Carroll County;

Choctaw County;

Grenada County;

Montgomery County;

Webster County; and

Winston County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1399; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1934, ch. 394; Laws, 1938, ch. 275; Laws, 1940, ch. 226; Laws, 1962, chs. 289, 290; Laws, 1966, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 397, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 324, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 385; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 4; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 27; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 47; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-20.
Fifth district; number of judges.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Fifth Circuit Court District.

The two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 324, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 49; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 48; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 11, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-21.
Sixth district; composition; divisions; number and election of judges.

The Sixth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Adams County;

Amite County;

Franklin County; and

Wilkinson County.

The Sixth Circuit Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 6-1 shall consist of Wilkinson County and the following precincts in the following counties:

Adams County: Airport, By-Pass Fire Station, Carpenter, Concord*, Courthouse*, Duncan Park*, Foster Mound, Maryland*, Northside School, Pine Ridge, Thompson and Washington*; and

Amite County: Ariel, Berwick, Crosby, East Centreville, East Gloster*, Gloster*, Homochitto, South Liberty* and Street.

Subdistrict 6-2 shall consist of Franklin County and the following precincts in the following counties:

Adams County: Beau Pre, Bellemont, Concord*, Convention Center, Courthouse*, Duncan Park*, Kingston, Liberty Park, Maryland*, Morgantown, Oakland, Palestine and Washington*; and

Amite County: Amite River, East Fork, East Gloster*, East Liberty, Gloster*, Liberty, New Zion, Oneil, Riceville, Smithdale, South Liberty*, Tangipahoa, Tickfaw, Walls and Zion Hills.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Sixth Circuit Court District. The two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct. One (1) judge shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1400; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1942, ch. 310; Laws, 1958, ch. 253; Laws, 1979, ch. 424; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 413; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 28; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 49; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 40, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-23.
Seventh district; composition; divisions.

The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be Hinds County.

The Seventh Circuit Court District shall be divided into four (4) subdistricts in Hinds County as follows:

Subdistrict 7-1 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 44, 45, 46, 47, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 92, 93, 96 and 97.

Subdistrict 7-2 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 23, 27, 28, 29, 30 , 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, Brownsville, Cynthia, Pocahontas and Tinnin.

Subdistrict 7-3 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 24, 25, 26, 31, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63 , 64, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 86, 89, and Jackson State.

Subdistrict 7-4 shall consist of the following precincts in Hinds County: 87, 88, 90 , 91, 94, 95, Bolton, Byram 1, Byram 2, Cayuga, Chapel Hill, Clinton 1, Clinton 2, Clinton 3, Clinton 4, Clinton 5, Clinton 6, Dry Grove, Edwards, Learned, Old Byram, Pinehaven, Raymond 1, Raymond 2, Spring Ridge, St. Thomas, Terry, Utica 1 and Utica 2.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1401; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1932, ch. 146; Laws, 1954, Ex. Sess. ch. 17, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 344, § 8; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 29; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 50; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 41, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-25.
Seventh district; number and election of judges; powers and duties of judges.

There shall be four (4) circuit judges for the Seventh Circuit Court District. One (1) judge shall be elected from each subdistrict.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the court in the First Judicial District of Hinds County, in the discretion of the senior circuit judge, may be divided into civil and criminal divisions as a matter of convenience, by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1414.3; Laws, 1954 Ex. ch. 17, §§ 2-5 (¶¶ 1-4); Laws, 1964, ch. 319, §§ 1-4 (¶¶ 1-4); Laws, 1982, ch. 421; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 50; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 51, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-7-27.
Eighth district; composition.

The Eighth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Leake County;

Neshoba County;

Newton County; and

Scott County.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Eighth Circuit Court District.

The two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1402; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1934, ch. 183; Laws, 1936, ch. 228; Laws, 1938, ch. 276; Laws, 1942, ch. 311; Laws, 1954, ch. 244; Laws, 1962, ch. 291; Laws, 1966, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 344, § 9; Laws, 1973, ch. 356, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 319; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 6; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 30; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 52; Laws, 1997, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 42, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-29.
Ninth district; composition; divisions.

The Ninth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Issaquena County;

Sharkey County; and

Warren County.

The Ninth Circuit Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 9-1 shall consist of Issaquena County, Sharkey County and the following precincts in Warren County: 3-61 Store*, American Legion Hall, Auditorium, Brunswick, Cedar Grove*, Kings*, Number 7 Fire Station*, St. Aloysius and Vicksburg Junior High School*.

Subdistrict 9-2 shall consist of the following precincts in Warren County: 3-61 Store*, Beechwood, Bovina, Cedar Grove*, Culkin, Elks Lodge, Goodrum, Jett, Kings*, Moose Lodge, Number 7 Fire Station*, Oak Ridge, Plumbers Hall, Redwood, Tingleville, Vicksburg Junior High School*, YMCA and Yokena.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1403; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1938, ch. 277; Laws, 1966, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 365, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 418; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 7; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 31; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 53; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 43, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-30.
Ninth district; number and election of judges.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Ninth Circuit Court District. One (1) judge shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1978, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 51; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 54, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-7-31.
Tenth district; composition.

The Tenth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Clarke County;

Kemper County;

Lauderdale County; and

Wayne County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1404; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1934, ch. 184; Laws, 1950, ch. 354; Laws, 1962, ch. 292; Laws, 1964, ch. 313; Laws, 1972, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 360, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 8; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 32; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 55; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 44, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-32.
Tenth district; number of judges.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Tenth Circuit Court District.

The two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 52; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 56; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 12, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 45, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-33.
Eleventh district; composition; divisions.

The Eleventh Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Bolivar County;

Coahoma County;

Quitman County; and

Tunica County.

The Eleventh Circuit Court District shall be divided into three (3) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 11-1 shall consist of the following precincts from the following counties:

Bolivar County: Benoit, Beulah, Boyle, Choctaw, Cleveland Courthouse, East Central Cleveland*, East Cleveland*, East Rosedale, Gunnison, Longshot, North Cleveland, Northwest Cleveland*, Pace, Scott, Shaw, Skene, South Cleveland*, Stringtown, West Central Cleveland, West Cleveland and West Rosedale; and

Coahoma County: Bobo, Clarksdale 2-4*, Clarksdale 5-4*, Farrell*, Rena Lara and Sherard*.

Subdistrict 11-2 shall consist of the following precincts from the following counties:

Bolivar County: Cleveland Eastgate, Duncan/Alligator, East Central Cleveland*, East Cleveland*, Merigold, Mound Bayou, Northwest Cleveland*, Renova, Shelby, South Cleveland* and Winstonville;

Coahoma County: Cagle Crossing, Clarksdale 1-4*, Clarksdale 3-3, Clarksdale 3-4, Clarksdale 4-2, Clarksdale 4-3, Dublin and Roundaway; and

Quitman County: Belen*, District 3 South*, Lambert, Northwest Marks, Southwest Marks and West Lambert.

Subdistricts 11-3 shall consist of Tunica County and the following precincts in the following counties:

Coahoma County: Clarksdale 1-4*, Clarksdale 2-4*, Clarksdale 5-4*, Coahoma, Farrell*, Friar’s Point, Jonestown, Lula, Lyon and Sherard*; and

Quitman County: Belen*, Crenshaw, Crowder, Darling, District 3 North, District 3 South* and Sledge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1405; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1940, ch. 227; Laws, 1942, ch. 315; Laws, 1950, ch. 334; Laws, 1952, ch. 233; Laws, 1956, ch. 225; Laws, 1964, ch. 748; Laws, 1968, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 392, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 9; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 33; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 57; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 46, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-34.
Eleventh district; number and election of judges.

There shall be three (3) judges for the Eleventh Circuit Court District. One (1) judge shall be elected from each subdistrict.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 420; Laws, 1983, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 53; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 58, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-7-35.
Twelfth district; composition.

The Twelfth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Forrest County; and

Perry County.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Twelfth Circuit Court District. The two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1406; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1954, ch. 254, § 5; Laws, 1956, chs. 226, 227; Laws, 1958, ch. 243; Laws, 1964, chs. 315, 316; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 10; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 34; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 59; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 47, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-37.
Thirteenth district; composition.

The Thirteenth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Covington County;

Jasper County;

Simpson County; and

Smith County.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Thirteenth Circuit Court District. The two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1407; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1934, ch. 185; Laws, 1962, ch. 293; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 11; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 35; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 60; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 48, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-39.
Fourteenth district; composition; number of judges.

The Fourteenth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Lincoln County;

Pike County; and

Walthall County.

There shall be two (2) judges for the Fourteenth Circuit Court District.

The two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One” and “Place Two.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1408; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1940, ch. 225; Laws, 1971, ch. 459; Laws, 1973, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 12; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 36; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 61; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 13, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 49, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-41.
Fifteenth district; composition.

The Fifteenth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Jefferson Davis County;

Lamar County;

Lawrence County;

Marion County; and

Pearl River County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1409; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1932, ch. 149; Laws, 1950, ch. 335; Laws, 1952, ch. 234; Laws, 1958, ch. 286; Laws, 1960, ch. 231; Laws, 1964, ch. 317; Laws, 1970, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 322; Laws, 1975, ch. 479; Laws, 1976, ch. 336; Laws, 1977, ch. 319; Laws, 1979, ch. 308; Laws, 1981, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1982, chs. 417, § 1; 461; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 13; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 37; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 62; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 50, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-42.
Fifteenth district; number of judges.

There shall be three (3) judges for the Fifteenth Circuit Court District.

The three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two,” and “Place Three.” The judge to fill Place One must be a resident of Jefferson Davis, Lamar, Lawrence or Marion County. The judge to fill Place Two may be a resident of any county in the district. The judge to fill Place Three must be a resident of Pearl River County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 417, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 54; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 63; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 14, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 51, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-43.
Sixteenth district; composition.

The Sixteenth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Clay County;

Lowndes County;

Noxubee County; and

Oktibbeha County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1410; Laws, 1931, ch. 37; Laws, 1934, ch. 186; Laws, 1936, ch. 229; Laws, 1942, ch. 308; Laws, 1950, ch. 361; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 37; Laws, 1958, chs. 270, 278; Laws, 1960, ch. 232; Laws, 1962, ch. 294, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1966, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 360, § 4; Laws, 1978, ch. 482, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 351; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 14; Laws, 1983, 1st Ex Sess ch. 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 38; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 64; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 52, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-44.
Sixteenth district; number of judges.

There shall be three (3) judges for the Sixteenth Circuit Court District.

The three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two” and “Place Three.” The judge to fill Place One must be a resident of Lowndes County. The judge to fill Place Two must be a resident of Oktibbeha County. The judge to fill Place Three must be a resident of either Clay or Noxubee County. Election of the three (3) offices of judge shall be by election to be held in every county within the Sixteenth Circuit Court District.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 344; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 65; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 15, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 53, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-45.
Seventeenth district; composition; divisions.

The Seventeenth Circuit Court District shall be divided into two (2) subdistricts as follows:

Subdistrict 17-1 shall be composed of DeSoto County; and

Subdistrict 17-2 shall be composed of Panola County, Tallahatchie County, Tate County and Yalobusha County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 473; 1942, § 1411; Laws, 1932, ch. 147; Laws, 1968, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 15; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 39; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 66; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 54, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-46.
Seventeenth district; number and election of judges.

There shall be four (4) circuit judges for the Seventeenth Circuit Court District.

For the purpose of appointment and election, the four (4)judge ships shall be separate and distinct, and one (1) judge shall be elected from Subdistrict 17-1, two (2) judges shall be elected from Subdistrict 17-2, and one (1) judge shall be elected from every county in the district. The two (2) judgeships in Subdistrict 17-2 shall be denominated as “Place One” and “Place Two,” the judgeship in Subdistrict 17-1 shall be denominated as “Place Three,” and the at-large judgeship shall be denominated as “Place Four.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 413; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 55; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 67; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 16, eff Jan. 1, 2007.

§ 9-7-47.
Eighteenth district; composition.

The Eighteenth Circuit Court District shall be Jones County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1411.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 254, §§ 2-4, 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 295; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 16; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 40; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 68, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-7-49.
Nineteenth district; composition; local contributions for support of court.

The Nineteenth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

George County;

Greene County; and

Jackson County.

The local contribution required for the maintenance of the Nineteenth Circuit Court District shall not exceed, as to George and Greene Counties, the amount of their present local contribution in their present respective circuit court districts, and any excess shall be paid by Jackson County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1411.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 296, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1964, ch. 318, §§ 1, 2, 4 (¶¶ 2, 4, 7); Laws, 1970, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 305; Laws, 1979, ch. 377; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 17; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 41; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 69; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 55, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-51.
Nineteenth district; number and election of judges; divisions.

There shall be three (3) judges for the Nineteenth Circuit Court District. The three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two” and “Place Three.”

The senior judge of the Nineteenth Circuit Court District may divide the court of any county within the district into civil, criminal and appellate court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1411.8; Laws, 1970, ch. 333, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1978, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 56; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 70; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 56, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-53.
Twentieth district; composition.

The Twentieth Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Madison County; and

Rankin County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1411.9; Laws, 1971, ch. 344; Laws, 1976, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 305, ch. 499, § 18; Laws, 1984, ch. 360, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 42; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 71; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 57, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-54.
Twentieth district; number of judges.

There shall be three (3) judges for the Twentieth Circuit Court District.

The three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct and denominated for purposes of appointment and election only as “Place One,” “Place Two” and “Place Three.” The judge to fill Place One must reside in Rankin County, the judge to fill Place Two must reside in Madison County, and the judge to fill Place Three may reside in either Madison or Rankin County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 481, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 57; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 72; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 17, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 58, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-55.
Twenty-first district; composition.

The Twenty-first Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Holmes County;

Humphreys County; and

Yazoo County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 73; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 59, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).

§ 9-7-57.
Twenty-second district; composition.

The Twenty-second Circuit Court District is composed of the following counties:

Claiborne County;

Copiah County; and

Jefferson County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 74; Laws, 2015, ch. 476, § 60, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015).